District of Columbia statutes.
1-1021.03

Applicability of § 1-1001.16 to initiative petitions circulated on or after October 1, 1978, and before June 7, 1979.

With respect to any initiative petition circulated on or after October 1, 1978, and before June 7, 1979, that is presented to or offered for filing to the Board of Elections and Ethics, § 1-1001.16 shall apply: Except, that:

(1)

The provisions of subsections (h)(1), (j)(1), (j)(3), (k)(1)(B) and (k)(1)(C) of § 1-1001.16 shall not be applied in the case of such petition;

(2)

Subsection (b) of § 1-1001.16 shall not apply to the extent that it would require the assignment and use of a serial number prior to the circulation and filing of such petition;

(3)

Subsections (c) through (f) of § 1-1001.16 shall not apply to the extent that they would require the approval of a summary statement, short title, and legislative form for an initiative measure prior to the circulation and filing of such petitions; and

(4)

Subsection (g) of § 1-1001.16 shall not apply to such petition: Provided, however, that each sheet of the petition shall include a statement declaring that each person signing must be or is a registered voter in the District of Columbia.

June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 9, 25 DCR 9454
1981 Ed., § 1-1325.
1973 Ed., § 1-1119.2.